All Classes/sin.foma
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define Ba1 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];



read lexc a1.lexc
define Lexicona1;

define BalaClass        [..]  -> ැ || A _ A  "^" Ba1 ;


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa1Grammar 	Lexicona1            .o.
                        BalaClass          .o.
               	        Cleanup;



read lexc a2.lexc
define Lexicona2;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa2Grammar 	Lexicona2            .o.
               	        Cleanup;


define Ba3 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];


read lexc a3.lexc
define Lexicona3;

######### Rewrite rules

define BalaClassa3        [..]  -> ැ || A _ [A A |A ් A | ං A]  "^" Ba3 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa3Grammar 	Lexicona3            .o.
                        BalaClassa3          .o.
               	        Cleanup;



define Ba4 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];


read lexc a4.lexc
define Lexicona4;


define AgayaClass          අ -> ඇ || .#. _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define UyaClass            උ -> ඉ || .#. _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define OthaClass           ඔ -> එ || .#. _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define KotaClass         ො -> ෙ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define SoodaClass        ෝ -> ේ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define PaadaClass          ා -> ෑ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;
define DuwaClass           ු -> ි || .#. A _ ?*  "^" Ba4 ;


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa4Grammar 	Lexicona4            .o.
                        AgayaClass         .o.
                        UyaClass           .o.
                        OthaClass          .o.
                        KotaClass          .o.
                        SoodaClass         .o.
                        PaadaClass         .o.
                        DuwaClass          .o.
               	        Cleanup;

define Ba5 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];



read lexc a5.lexc
define Lexicona5;


define PathuraClass1         [..] -> ැ || .#. A _ A ?*  "^" Ba5 ;
define PathuraClass2          ු  -> ි || .#. A ැ A _ ?* "^" Ba5 ;
define AkulaClass1             අ -> ඇ || .#. _ ?*  "^" Ba5 ;
define UduraClass1             උ -> ඉ || .#. _ ?*  "^" Ba5 ;
define AkulaClass2             ු -> ි || .#. [ඇ | ඉ] A _ ?* "^" Ba5 ;
define UganwaClass2          [..] -> ැ || .#. ඉ A _ A ?* "^" Ba5 ;
define KalaththaClass2       [..] -> ැ || .#. A ැ A _ A ් A "^" Ba5 ;
define HadaaraClass2           ා -> ෑ || .#. A ැ A _ A "^" Ba5 ;
define PupuraClass1            ු -> ි || .#. A _ A ?* "^" Ba5 ;
define PupuraClass2            ු -> ි || .#. A ි A _ A ?* "^" Ba5 ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa5Grammar 	Lexicona5                .o.
                        PathuraClass1          .o.
                        PathuraClass2          .o.
                        AkulaClass1            .o.
                        UduraClass1            .o.
                        AkulaClass2            .o.
                        UganwaClass2           .o.
                        KalaththaClass2        .o.
                        HadaaraClass2          .o.
                        PupuraClass1           .o.
                        PupuraClass2           .o.
               	        Cleanup;

define Ba6 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ා ය | ේ ය | ෝ ය | ේ | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ];



read lexc a6.lexc
define Lexicona6;


define PalandaClass        [..]  -> ැ || .#. A _ A A ් A  "^" Ba6 ;
define BassaClass        [..]  -> ැ || A _ A ් A  "^" Ba6 ;
define AndaClass           අ  -> ඇ || .#. _ A ් A  "^" Ba6 ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Classa6Grammar 	Lexicona6             .o.
                        PalandaClass        .o.
                        BassaClass          .o.
                        AndaClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;

read lexc B.lexc
define LexiconB;



define Bb1 [ ී ව ා |ී ]; 

define Cb1 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්| ු ණ ු | ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ය | ව ා | ව න ් න  ේ | ි ය |  ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define Db1 [ද | ස | ග | ට | ත ];


define CBRule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [Bb1 | Cb1 | Db1] ;
define CBRule2  අ -> ඇ ||  _ A "^" [Cb1|Db1] ;
define CBRule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" [Cb1|Db1] ;
define CBRule4  Db1 -> 0 || _ "^" [Db1];


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define B1Grammar 	LexiconB .o.
		CBRule1		.o.
		CBRule3		.o.
              	CBRule2		.o.
		CBRule4		.o.
		Cleanup;

read lexc C1.lexc
define LexiconC1;



define BC1 [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය |ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ේ ය |
 ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව න ් න ේ ];    

define CC1 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා |ු ණ ු  | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ |  ි ය |  ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define DC1 [ ් ද | ් ද ෙ ම ි| ් ද ෙ ම ු | ් ද ෙ හ ි | ් ද ෙ හ ු | ් ද ේ ය | ් ද ා ය | ් ද ෝ ය | ් ද ො ත ් | ් ද ු ව ේ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CCRule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BC1 | CC1 | DC1 | ඳ] ;
define CCRule2  ඳ -> න ් ද || _ "^" [BC1 ];
define CCRule5  ඳ -> න || _ "^" [DC1];
define CCRule3  අ -> ඇ ||  _ A "^" [CC1 | DC1 |ඳ] ;
define CCRule4  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" [CC1 | DC1 | ඳ];
define CCRule6  ඳ -> 0 || _ "^" ඳ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define C1Grammar 	LexiconC1 .o.
		CCRule1		.o.
              	CCRule3		.o.
		CCRule4		.o.
		CCRule2		.o.
		CCRule5		.o.
		Cleanup;



read lexc C2.lexc
define LexiconC2;



define BC2 [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය |ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ේ ය |
 ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව න ් න ේ ];    

define CC2 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා |ු ණ ු  | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ]; 

define DC2 [ ් බ | ් බ ෙ ම ි| ් බ ෙ ම ු | ් බ ෙ හ ි | ් බ ෙ හ ු | ් බ ේ ය | ් බ ා ය | ් බ ෝ ය  | ් බ ො ත ් | ් බ ු ව ේ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CC2Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BC2 | CC2 | DC2] ;
define CC2Rule2  ඹ -> ම ් බ || _ "^" [BC2 ];
define CC2Rule5  ඹ -> ම || _ "^" [DC2];



# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define C2Grammar 	LexiconC2 .o.
		CC2Rule1		.o.
              
		CC2Rule2		.o.
		CC2Rule5		.o.
		Cleanup;


read lexc C3.lexc
define LexiconC3;



define BC3 [ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය |ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ේ ය |
 ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව න ් න ේ  | න ් න ේ | ො ත ් | ව ා | න ු ය ේ];    

define CC3 [ ව ේ|ු ණ ු  | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි |  ි ය  | ු ව ේ ]; 

define DC3 [ ් ද | ් ද ෙ ම ි| ් ද ෙ ම ු | ් ද ෙ හ ි | ් ද ෙ හ ු | ් ද ේ ය | ් ද ා ය | ් ද ෝ ය ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CC3Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BC3 | CC3 | DC3 | ඳ] ;
define CC3Rule5  ඳ -> න || _ "^" [DC3];
define CC3Rule4  [..] -> ැ ||  A _ A A "^" [CC3 | DC3 | ඳ];
define CC3Rule2  ඳ -> 0 || _ "^" ඳ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define C3Grammar 	LexiconC3 .o.
		CC3Rule1		.o.
		CC3Rule4		.o.
		CC3Rule5		.o.
		CC3Rule2		.o.		
		Cleanup;

read lexc D1.lexc
define LexiconD1;



define BD1 [ ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව ා | ව න ් න ේ ];    #######අමද 

define CD1 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු| ු ව ෙ හ ි|  ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ේ ය| ු ව ා ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු|ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ ත ි |ව ේ |ි ය |ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ | ි ය];   #####ඇමද 





######### Rewrite rules

define CD1Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BD1 | CD1 ] ;
define CD1Rule2  අ -> ඇ ||  .#. _ ?* "^" CD1 ;
define CD1Rule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" CD1 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D1Grammar 	LexiconD1 .o.
		CD1Rule1		.o.
		CD1Rule3		.o.
              	CD1Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;


read lexc D2.lexc
define LexiconD2;



define BD2 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define CD2 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු| ු ව ෙ හ ි|  ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ේ ය| ු ව ෝ ය | ු ව ා ය | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු|ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ ත ි |ව ේ  |ි ය |ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ | ි ය];   #####ඇමද 



######### Rewrite rules

define CD2Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BD2 | CD2 ] ;
define CD2Rule2   ු ->  ි ||  _ A "^" CD2 ;
#define CD2Rule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" CD2 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D2Grammar 	LexiconD2 .o.
		CD2Rule1		.o.
		#CD2Rule3		.o.
              	CD2Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;


read lexc D3.lexc
define LexiconD3;


define BD3 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define CD3 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු| ු ව ෙ හ ි|  ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ේ ය| ු ව ෝ ය | ු ව ා ය | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු|ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ ත ි |ව ේ |ි ය |ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ |  ි ය];   #####ඇමද 



######### Rewrite rules

define CD3Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BD3 | CD3 ] ;
#define CD3Rule2   ු ->  ි ||  _ A "^" CD3 ;
#define CD3Rule3  [..] -> ැ || A _ A "^" CD3 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D3Grammar 	LexiconD3 .o.
		CD3Rule1		.o.
		#CD3Rule3		.o.
              	#CD3Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;


read lexc D4.lexc
define LexiconD4;


define BD4 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ් | ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 

define CD4 [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු| ු ව ෙ හ ි|  ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ේ ය| ු ව ෝ ය | ු ව ා ය | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු|ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ ත ි |ව ේ |ි ය |ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ | ි ය];   #####ඇමද 



######### Rewrite rules

define CD4Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BD4 | CD4 ] ;
define CD4Rule2   අ -> ඇ || .#. _ ?* "^" CD4 ;
define CD4Rule3  [..] -> ැ || .#. A _ A ?* "^" CD4 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D4Grammar 	LexiconD4 .o.
		CD4Rule1		.o.
		CD4Rule3		.o.
              	CD4Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;



read lexc D5.lexc
define LexiconD5;



define BD5 [ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ව |  ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි| ව න ් න ෙ හ ු| ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්| ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 


define CD5 [ ී |ව ෙ ය ි |ව ෙ  ි|ව ේ];   #####ඇමද 



######### Rewrite rules

define CD5Rule1  ි -> 0 || _ "^" [BD5 | CD5 ] ;
#define CD5Rule2   අ -> ඇ || .#. _ ?* "^" CD5 ;
#define CD5Rule3  [..] -> ැ || .#. A _ A ?* "^" CD5 ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D5Grammar 	LexiconD5 .o.
		CD5Rule1		.o.
		#CD5Rule3		.o.
              #	CD5Rule2		.o.
		Cleanup;


read lexc E1.lexc
define LexiconE1;


define BE1 [  ව ම ි න ් |ව ත  ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය  |ව ා | ව න ් න ේ]; 
define EE1 [ ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා ]; 

define GE1 [ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු ];  

define DE1 [ී ව ා |ා | න ් න ට |ී];
